Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3299
Enrollee, defined.

Enrollee shall mean an individual who is covered by a health maintenance organization and shall include both subscribers and dependents of subscribers.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 8.